New York, session 2025-2026, A8964.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 1 of chapter 54 of the laws of 2025 providing capi- 2 tal grants to municipalities under the consolidated local street and 3 highway improvement program, is amended by repealing the items hereinbe- 4 low set forth in brackets and by adding to such section the other items 5 underscored in this section. 6 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION 7 CAPITAL PROJECTS 2025-26 8 OTHER TRANSPORTATION AID (CCP) 9 Capital Projects Funds - Other 10 Capital Projects Fund - 30000 11 Highway Aid Purpose 12 For capital grants to municipalities under 13 the consolidated local street and highway 14 improvement program: 15 The sum of $589,300,000 to counties, cities, 16 towns and villages for reimbursement of 17 eligible costs of local highway and bridge 18 projects pursuant to sections 16 and 16-a EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13538-01-5 A. 8964 2 1 of chapter 329 of the laws of 1991, as 2 added by section 9 of chapter 330 of the 3 laws of 1991, as amended. For the purposes 4 of computing allocations to munici- 5 palities, the amount distributed pursuant 6 to section 16 of chapter 329 of the laws 7 of 1991 shall be deemed to be 8 $131,845,000. The amount distributed 9 pursuant to section 16-a of chapter 329 of 10 the laws of 1991 shall be deemed to be 11 $457,455,000. Notwithstanding the 12 provisions of any general or special law, 13 the amounts deemed distributed in accord- 14 ance with section 16 of chapter 329 of the 15 laws of 1991 shall be adjusted so that 16 such amounts will not be less than 90.928 17 percent of the "funding level" as defined 18 in subdivision 5 of section 10-c of the 19 highway law for each such municipality. In 20 order to achieve the objectives of section 21 16 of chapter 329 of the laws of 1991, to 22 the extent necessary, the amounts in 23 excess of 90.928 percent of the funding 24 level to be deemed distributed to each 25 municipality under this subdivision shall 26 be reduced in equal proportion. 27 The sum of $58,797,000 to municipalities for 28 reimbursement of eligible costs of local 29 highway and bridge projects pursuant to 30 sections 16 and 16-a of chapter 329 of the 31 laws of 1991, as added by section 9 of 32 chapter 330 of the laws of 1991, as 33 amended. For the purposes of computing 34 allocations to municipalities, the amount 35 distributed pursuant to section 16 of 36 chapter 329 of the laws of 1991 shall be 37 deemed to be $13,155,000. The amount 38 distributed pursuant to section 16-a of 39 chapter 329 of the laws of 1991 shall be 40 deemed to be $45,642,000. Notwithstanding 41 the provisions of any general or special 42 law, the amounts deemed distributed in 43 accordance with section 16 of chapter 329 44 of the laws of 1991 shall be adjusted so 45 that such amounts will not be less than 46 9.072 percent of the "funding level" as 47 defined in subdivision 5 of section 10-c 48 of the highway law for each such munici- 49 pality. In order to achieve the objectives 50 of section 16 of chapter 329 of the laws 51 of 1991, to the extent necessary, the 52 amounts in excess of 9.072 percent of the 53 funding level to be deemed distributed to 54 each municipality under this paragraph 55 shall be reduced in equal proportion. To 56 the extent that the total of remaining A. 8964 3 1 payment allocations calculated herein 2 varies from $58,797,000, the payment 3 amounts to each locality shall be adjusted 4 by a uniform percentage so that the total 5 payments equal $58,797,000. Up to twenty- 6 five percent of annual capital grants 7 apportionments to counties, cities, towns 8 and villages under the consolidated local 9 street and highway improvement program may 10 be utilized for the purchase of street and 11 highway construction and maintenance 12 equipment and materials. The Commissioner 13 shall promulgate rules and regulations 14 establishing the eligibility and criteria 15 for such municipalities to purchase such 16 equipment and materials. 17 Payments shall be made on the fifteenth day 18 of June, September, December and March 19 (17CH2521) (54267) ......................... 648,097,000 20 For additional capital grants to counties, 21 cities, towns and villages for the 22 reimbursement of eligible costs of local 23 highway and bridge projects pursuant to 24 sections 16 and 16-a of chapter 329 of the 25 laws of 1991, as added by section 9 of 26 chapter 330 of the laws of 1991, as 27 amended: 28 Up to twenty-five percent of annual capital 29 grants apportionments to counties, cities, 30 towns and villages under the consolidated 31 local street and highway improvement 32 program may be utilized for the purchase 33 of street and highway construction and 34 maintenance equipment and materials. The 35 Commissioner shall promulgate rules and 36 regulations establishing the eligibility 37 and criteria for such municipalities to 38 purchase such equipment and materials. 39 Payments shall be made on the fifteenth 40 day of June, September, December and March 41 .......................................... 1,851,903,000 42 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately and shall be deemed to 43 have been in full force and effect on and after April 1, 2025.